Utah statutes.
41-22-12.7.    Enhanced penalties for unlawful motor vehicle use on public
or private property.
(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for unlawful cross-country
use of a motor vehicle on public land or unlawful motor vehicle use on private
property if the person:
(a)  violates Section 41-22-12.2, 41-22-12.5, or 41-22-13; and
(b) (i)  has been convicted of violating Section 41-22-12, 41-22-12.2,
41-22-12.5, or 41-22-13 within the last two years; or
(ii)  knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly:
(A)  damages vegetation, trees, wetlands, riparian areas, fences, structures,
or improvements; or
(B)  harasses wildlife or livestock.
(2)  As part of any sentence for a conviction of a violation described in
Subsection (1), the court may:
(a)  impose a fine not to exceed $300;
(b)  require the person to pay restitution not to exceed $1,000 for damage
caused by the unlawful motor vehicle use; and
(c)  require the person to perform community service in the form of repairing
any damage to the public land caused by the unlawful motor vehicle use.
(3)  As part of any sentence for a conviction described in Subsection (1) that
is within five years of a prior conviction described in Subsection (1), the
court may:
(a)  impose a fine not to exceed $1,000;
(b)  require the person to pay restitution not to exceed $2,000 for damage
caused by the unlawful motor vehicle use; and
(c)  require the person to perform community service in the form of repairing
any damage caused by the unlawful motor vehicle use.
